Massachusetts, session 194th, S994.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 186 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:-  
Section 15G. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:  
"Algorithmic device", any computational process, including a computational process 
derived from machine learning or other artificial intelligence techniques, that processes or 
calculates nonpublic competitor data for the purpose of advising a lessor or landlord concerning 
the amount of rent that the lessor or landlord may consider charging a tenant; provided, however 
that "algorithmic device" shall not include: (i) any report published periodically, but not more 
frequently than monthly, by a trade association that receives renter data and publishes it in an 
aggregated and anonymous matter; or (ii) a product used for the purpose of establishing rent or 

of 3 12 income limits in accordance with the affordable housing program guidelines of a local 
government, the commonwealth, the federal government or other political subdivision.  
“Coordinating function”, any action that includes: (i) collecting historical or 
contemporaneous prices, supply levels or lease or rental contract termination and renewal dates 
of residential dwelling units from two or more rental property lessors or landlords; (ii) analyzing 
or processing of historical or contemporaneous prices, supply levels or lease or rental contract 
termination and renewal dates of residential dwelling units from two or more rental property 
lessors or landlords through use of a system, software or process that uses computation, 
including by using the information to train an algorithm; and (iii) recommending rental prices, 
lease renewal terms or ideal occupancy levels to a rental property lessor or landlord.  
"Coordinator", any person who operates an algorithmic device, software or data analytics 
service that performs a coordinating function for any residential rental property lessor or 
landlord, including a residential rental property lessor or landlord performing a coordinating 
function for their own benefit.  
"Nonpublic competitor data", information that is not widely available or easily accessible 
to the public, including information about actual rent prices, occupancy rates, lease start and end 
dates, and similar data, regardless of whether the data are attributable to a specific competitor or 
anonymized, and that is derived from or otherwise provided by another person that competes in 
the same market as a person, or a related market.  
“Person”, any natural person or persons, or any corporation, partnership, company, trust 
or association of persons.  

of 3 33  "Residential Dwelling Unit", any house, apartment, accessory unit or other unit intended 
to be used as a primary residence in the state.  
(b) In setting the amount of rent to be charged to a tenant for the occupancy of a 
residential dwelling unit, determining any change in the amount of rent to be charged to a tenant 
for the renewed occupancy of a residential dwelling unit, or otherwise determining what amount 
to charge a tenant to rent a residential dwelling unit, or determining occupancy levels of 
residential dwelling units, no lessor or landlord shall employ, use or rely upon an algorithmic 
device or coordinator.  
(c) A violation of this section shall constitute a violation of section 2 of Chapter 93A.  
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect 90 days after its passage.